District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.10

Foreign support agreement.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a tribunal of the District shall recognize and enforce a foreign support agreement registered in the District.

(b)

An application or direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement must be accompanied by:

(1)

A complete text of the foreign support agreement; and

(2)

A record stating that the foreign support agreement is enforceable as an order of support in the issuing country.

(c)

A tribunal of the District may vacate the registration of a foreign support agreement only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

(d)

In a contest of a foreign support agreement, a tribunal of the District may refuse recognition and enforcement of the agreement if it finds:

(1)

Recognition and enforcement of the agreement is manifestly incompatible with public policy;

(2)

The agreement was obtained by fraud or falsification;

(3)

The agreement is incompatible with a support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose in the District, another state, or a foreign country if the support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement under this chapter in the District; or

(4)

The record submitted under subsection (b) of this section lacks authenticity or integrity.

(e)

A proceeding for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement must be suspended during the pendency of a challenge to or appeal of the agreement before a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 710, 63 DCR 222